Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-2103
City; utilization of funds; powers.

A city that has
been authorized to utilize funds pursuant to the Local Option Municipal Economic
Development Act for purposes of sections 66-1868 and 66-2101 to 66-2107 shall
have all necessary powers to implement and to carry out its powers and duties
under such sections.

Laws 2012, LB1115, § 3.

Local Option Municipal Economic Development Act, see section 18-2701.